Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 1. Public Transportation Policy

§ 5081.
Definition.

As used in this subchapter:

“Public transportation” means the transportation of persons, including groups of the general public with special needs, by all means available to the general public.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 262

(Adj. Sess.).

§ 5082.
Findings and declarations.

Public transportation is an important matter of State concern, essential to the economic growth of the State and to the public health, safety, and welfare of present and future generations of Vermonters.

In each fiscal year, a portion of the Transportation Fund shall be dedicated to the continued support of public transit.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 262

(Adj. Sess.); amended

2001, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. June 21, 2002.

§ 5083.
Declaration of policy.

It shall be the State’s policy to make maximum use of available federal funds for the support of public transportation. State operating support funds shall be included in Agency operating budgets to the extent that funds are available. State policy shall support the maintenance of existing public transit services and creation of new services including the following goals:

Provision for basic mobility for transit-dependent persons, as defined in the current public transit policy plan, including meeting the performance standards for urban, suburban, and rural areas. The density of a service area’s population is an important factor in determining whether the service offered is fixed route, demand-response, or volunteer drivers.

Expanding public transit service in rural areas and increasing ridership statewide.

Access to employment, including creation of demand-response service.

Congestion mitigation to preserve air quality, decrease greenhouse gas emissions, and sustain the highway network.

Advancement of economic development objectives, including services for workers and visitors that support the travel and tourism industry. Applicants for “new starts” in this service sector shall demonstrate a high level of locally derived income for operating costs from fare-box recovery, contract income, or other income.

The Agency of Transportation shall evaluate proposals for new public transit service submitted by providers in response to a notice of funding availability, by examining feasibility studies submitted by providers. The feasibility studies shall address criteria set forth in the most recent public transit policy plan.

The Agency, in cooperation with the Public Transit Advisory Council, shall adopt appropriate performance and service standards for transit systems receiving federal or State assistance. The Agency of Transportation shall provide guidance, training, funding, and technical assistance to transit systems in order to meet the performance and service standards established.

The Agency of Transportation shall provide written guidance, funding, and technical assistance in the preparation of financial and management plans for public transit systems for each fiscal year. To provide a foundation for financial stability and reliability in the provision of transportation services to the public, the Agency of Transportation shall, in cooperation with the Public Transit Advisory Council, establish both short and long-range fiscal, operating, and capital investment plans to support the goals outlined in this section and regional transportation development plan proposals and regional plans as required by section 5089 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 262

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1993, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. June 17, 1994;

1999, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. May 29, 2000;

2003, No. 56

, § 37, eff. June 4, 2003;

2011, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 32;

2019, No. 59

, § 18.

§ 5084.
Public Transit Advisory Council.

The Public Transit Advisory Council shall be created by the Secretary of Transportation under

19 V.S.A. § 7(f)(5)

, to consist of the following members:

the Secretary of Transportation or designee;

three representatives of the Vermont Public Transportation Association;

a representative of the Green Mountain Transit Authority;

the Secretary of Human Services or designee;

the Commissioner of Labor or designee;

the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development or designee;

a representative of the Vermont Center for Independent Living;

a representative of the Community of Vermont Elders;

a representative of private bus operators and taxi services;

a representative of Vermont intercity bus operators;

a representative of the Vermont Association of Planning and Development Agencies;

a representative of the Vermont League of Cities and Towns;

a citizen appointed by the Governor;

a member of the Senate, appointed by the Committee on Committees; and

a member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker.

The Advisory Council shall be chaired by the Secretary of Transportation or designee.

The Advisory Council shall meet no less than four times during each State fiscal year, excluding subcommittee meetings. The legislative members of the Council shall be entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in

2 V.S.A. § 406

. Members who are not State employees shall receive reimbursement of expenses and a per diem as provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

.

The Advisory Council shall serve as an advisory group to the Agency of Transportation on all matters relating to public transit service as defined in section 5088 of this title.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. May 29, 2000; amended

2003, No. 56

, § 38, eff. June 4, 2003;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 50, eff. June 9, 2004;

2011, No. 62

, § 32;

2017, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. May 21, 2018.